Florida, session 2026, SB1302.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 409.9746, Florida Statutes, is created 26 to read: 27 409.9746âEarly periodic screening, diagnostic, and 28 treatment services; pediatric behavioral and mental health 29 screenings.â 30 (1)âThe agency shall adopt rules establishing practice 31 parameters and protocols and requiring managed care plans to 32 provide early periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment 33 services consistent with such practice parameters and protocols, 34 including, but not limited to, all of the following: 35 (a)âThe use of validated, age-appropriate, trauma-informed 36 diagnostic tools based on nationally recognized clinical 37 practice guidelines to provide early periodic screening, 38 diagnostic, and treatment services to participants from birth 39 through 21 years of age. 40 (b)âAuthorizing a health care provider to use mobile 41 response teams, community mental health centers, behavioral 42 health hubs, and other qualified health care providers for 43 consultation, support with medication management, and 44 introduction of a patient to another health care provider as a 45 referral. 46 (c)âEncouraging parents or legal guardians to participate 47 in mental health programs that provide education and support, 48 including, but not limited to, general parenting skills or more 49 specialized programs that offer education and support for more 50 specific behavioral or mental health issues. 51 (d)âRequiring health care providers to give parents or 52 legal guardians information created by the Department of Health 53 about sleep, screen time, and nutrition. The department shall 54 develop such information and make it available for download by 55 health care providers. 56 (2)âBy January 1, 2027, the agency shall adopt performance 57 measures related to early periodic screening, diagnostic, and 58 treatment services and establish outcome data reporting 59 requirements. The agency shall use the measures as a tool to 60 monitor plan performance in connection with other measures 61 required pursuant to this part. Beginning January 1, 2028, and 62 annually thereafter, the agency shall submit a report on the 63 performance measures and outcome data to the Governor, the 64 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 65 Representatives. 66 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.